District of Columbia statutes.
31-1310

Grounds for rehabilitation.

The Commissioner may apply by petition to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for an order authorizing him or her to rehabilitate a domestic insurer or an alien insurer domiciled in the District based on any one or more of the following grounds:

(1)

The insurer is in such a condition that the further transaction of business would be hazardous financially to its policyholders, creditors, or the public.

(2)

There is reasonable cause to believe that there has been embezzlement from the insurer, wrongful sequestration or diversion of the insurer’s assets, forgery or fraud affecting the insurer, or other illegal conduct in, by, or with respect to the insurer that if established would endanger assets in an amount threatening the solvency of the insurer.

(3)

The insurer has failed to remove any person who in fact has executive authority in the insurer, whether an officer, manager, general agent, employee, or other person, if the person has been found after notice and hearing by the Commissioner to be dishonest or untrustworthy in a way affecting the insurer’s business.

(4)

Control of the insurer, whether by stock ownership or otherwise, and whether direct or indirect, is in a person or persons found after notice and hearing to be untrustworthy in any way that affects the insurer’s business.

(5)

Any person who in fact has executive authority in the insurer, whether an officer, manager, general agent, director or trustee, employee, or other person, has refused to be examined under oath by the Commissioner concerning its affairs, whether in the District or elsewhere, and after reasonable notice of the fact, the insurer has failed promptly and effectively to terminate its relationship with that person, or to prevent that person from influencing the insurer’s management.

(6)

After demand by the Commissioner under this chapter, or any law authorizing the Commissioner to examine the operations of an insurer, the insurer has failed to promptly make available for examination any of its own property, books, accounts, documents, or other records, or those of any subsidiary or related company within the control of the insurer, or those of any person having executive authority in the insurer so far as they pertain to the insurer.

(7)

Without first obtaining the written consent of the Commissioner, the insurer has transferred, or attempted to transfer, in a manner contrary to Chapter 7 of this title, substantially its entire property or business, or has entered into any transaction the effect of which is to merge, consolidate, or reinsure substantially its entire property or business in or with the property or business of any other person.

(8)

The insurer or its property has been or is the subject of an application for the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, conservator, or sequestrator or similar fiduciary of the insurer or its property other than as authorized under the insurance laws of the District, and the appointment has been made or is imminent, and the appointment would deprive the courts of the District of Columbia of jurisdiction or might prejudice the orderly delinquency proceedings under this chapter.

(9)

The insurer, within the previous 4 years, willfully violated its charter or articles of incorporation, its bylaws, any insurance law of the District, or any valid order of the Commissioner.

(10)

The insurer has failed to pay, within 60 days after due date, any obligation to any state or any subdivision or any judgment entered in any state, if the court in which the judgment was entered had jurisdiction over the subject matter, except that the nonpayment shall not be a ground until 60 days after any good faith effort by the insurer to contest the obligation has been terminated, whether it is before the Commissioner or in court, or the insurer has systematically attempted to compromise or renegotiate previously agreed settlements with its creditors on the ground that it is financially unable to pay its obligations in full.

(11)

The insurer has failed to file its annual report or other financial report required by statute within the time allowed by law, and, after written demand by the Commissioner, has failed to give an adequate explanation immediately.

(12)

The board of directors or the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote, or a majority of those individuals entitled to the control of those entities specified in the insurance laws of the District, request or consent to rehabilitation under this chapter.

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-35, § 11, 40 DCR 5773
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(z)(2), 44 DCR 1730
Rehabilitation, liquidation, or conservation of health maintenance organizations, see § 31-3420.
This section is referenced in § 31-1314, § 31-1315, § 31-1348, § 31-1349, and § 31-3420.
1981 Ed., § 35-2810.